Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1097.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 222. (1) The department may issue an emeritus license to an individual if the individual submits to the department an application for an emeritus license on a form provided by the department. An emeritus license issued under this section does not confer any right to the individual to engage in the practice of an occupation under this act. (2) The department shall issue an emeritus license if the applicant meets all of the following: (a) The applicant is retired from engaging in the practice of an occupation under this act. (b) The applicant submits documentation to the department that the applicant was previously licensed to engage in the practice of an occupation under this act and that the applicant's license was in good standing at the time the applicant's license expired. (c) The applicant provides acknowledgment that the applicant will not engage in the practice of the occupation for which the applicant was previously licensed. (3) An individual who is issued an emeritus license under this section shall not use any term associated with a license for an occupation under this act in any written or printed matter or display without adding "emeritus" to the term.